Wisconsin, session 2025, AB104.
do enact as follows:AB104,1Section 1. 146.36 of the statutes is created to read:146.36 Gender transition medical intervention. (1) Definitions. In this section:(a) “Biological sex” means the biological state of being female or male based on sex organs, chromosomes, and endogenous hormone profiles.(b) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1) (a) to (hp).(c) “Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.(2) Prohibition. A health care provider may not engage in, cause the engagement in, or make a referral for, any of the following practices upon a minor for the purpose of changing the minor’s body to correspond to a sex that is discordant with the minor’s biological sex:(a) Performing a surgery that sterilizes an individual, including castration, vasectomy, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, metoidioplasty, orchiectomy, penectomy, phalloplasty, and vaginoplasty.(b) Performing a mastectomy.(c) Administering, prescribing, or supplying any of the following medications:1. Puberty-blocking drugs to stop or delay normal puberty.2. Supraphysiologic doses of testosterone or other androgens to biological females.3. Supraphysiologic doses of estrogen to biological males.(d) Removing any otherwise healthy or nondiseased body part or tissue.(3) Applicability limitation. This section does not apply to any of the following:(a) A health care provider providing a service in accordance with a good faith medical decision of a parent or guardian of a minor born with a medically verifiable genetic disorder of sex development, including any of the following:1. External biological sex characteristics that are irresolvably ambiguous, such as in those born with 46,XX karyotype with virilization, with 46,XY karyotype with undervirilization, or having both ovarian and testicular tissue.2. A sexual development disorder when a physician has determined through genetic testing that the minor does not have the normal sex chromosome structure, sex steroid hormone production, or sex steroid hormone action for a biological male or biological female.(b) The treatment of any infection, injury, disease, or disorder that has been caused by or exacerbated by the performance of a gender transition medical procedure, whether or not that procedure was performed in accordance with state and federal law.(c) Any procedure undertaken because the minor suffers from a physical disorder, physical injury, or physical illness that would, as certified by a physician, place the minor in imminent danger of death or impairment of a major bodily function unless surgery is performed.AB104,2Section 2. 441.07 (1j) of the statutes is created to read:441.07 (1j) Subject to the rules promulgated under s. 440.03 (1), the board shall investigate allegations that any person licensed under this chapter has violated s. 146.36 (2). After an investigation, if the board finds that there is probable cause to believe that the person violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall hold a hearing on such conduct. After a hearing, if the board determines that the person has violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall revoke the person’s license and, if applicable, the person’s certificate to issue prescription orders under s. 441.16.AB104,3Section 3. 441.07 (2) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 17, is amended to read:441.07 (2) The board may reinstate a revoked license, no earlier than one year following revocation, upon receipt of an application for reinstatement. This subsection does not apply to a license that is revoked under sub. (1j) or (1r) or s. 440.12.AB104,4Section 4. 448.02 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:448.02 (3m) Investigations; hearing; action for gender transition medical intervention. The board shall investigate allegations that any person holding a license or certificate granted by the board has violated s. 146.36 (2). After an investigation, if the board finds that there is probable cause to believe that the person violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall hold a hearing on such conduct. After a hearing, if the board determines that the person has violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall revoke the person’s license or certificate. The board shall comply with the rules of procedure for the investigation, hearing, and action that are promulgated under ss. 440.03 (1) and 448.40.AB104,5Section 5. 448.02 (6) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 76, is amended to read:448.02 (6) Restoration of credential. The board may restore any license, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege that has been voluntarily surrendered or revoked under any of the provisions of this subchapter, on such terms and conditions as it may deem appropriate, except that the board may not restore any license or certificate that was revoked pursuant to sub. (3m).AB104,6Section 6. 448.02 (9) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:448.02 (9) Judicial review. (intro.) No injunction, temporary injunction, stay, restraining order or other order may be issued by a court in any proceeding for review that suspends or stays an order of the board to discipline a physician under sub. (3) (c), to revoke a physician’s license under sub. (3m), or to suspend or limit a physician’s license under sub. (4), except upon application to the court and a determination by the court that all of the following conditions are met:AB104,7Section 7. 448.978 (1v) of the statutes is created to read:448.978 (1v) Subject to the rules promulgated under s. 440.03 (1), the board shall investigate allegations that any person licensed under this subchapter has violated s. 146.36 (2). After an investigation, if the board finds that there is probable cause to believe that the person violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall hold a hearing on such conduct. After a hearing, if the board determines that the person has violated s. 146.36 (2), the board shall revoke the person’s license.AB104,8Section 8. 448.978 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:448.978 (2) (intro.) Subject to the rules promulgated under s. 440.03 (1) and except as provided in sub. (1v), if a person who applies for or holds a license or compact privilege issued under s. 448.974 does any of the following, the board may reprimand the person or deny, limit, suspend, or revoke the person’s license or compact privilege:AB104,9Section 9. Nonstatutory provisions.(1) Legislative intent statement. By including a 6-month delayed effective date in Section 10 (1) of this act, the legislature intends to allow time for appropriate medication tapering and discontinuation under the care of a physician or other health care provider for any minor who is using puberty-blocking drugs or cross-sex hormones for the purpose of changing the minor’s body to correspond to a sex that is discordant with the minor’s biological sex and who will be a minor when the act takes effect. For purposes of this subsection, the terms “biological sex,” “health care provider,” and “minor” have the meanings given in s. 146.36 (1).AB104,10Section 10. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after publication. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab104 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab104 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB104 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB104 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB104: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting